Wisconsin, session 2025, SB689.
do enact as follows:SB689,11Section 1. 66.1105 (6) (g) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB689,2,6266.1105 (6) (g) 1. (intro.) After Subject to subd. 1m., after the date on which a 3tax incremental district created by a city pays off the aggregate of all of its project 4costs, and notwithstanding the time at which such a district would otherwise be 5required to terminate under sub. (7), a city may extend the life of the district for one 6year 3 years if the city does all of the following:SB689,21Section 2. 66.1105 (6) (g) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB689,3,5266.1105 (6) (g) 1. b. The city forwards a copy of the resolution under subd. 1. a. 3and, if the extension is for more than one year, a copy of the resolution under subd. 41m., to the department of revenue, notifying the department that it must continue 5to authorize the allocation of tax increments to the district under par. (a).SB689,36Section 3. 66.1105 (6) (g) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:SB689,3,9766.1105 (6) (g) 1m. An extension under subd. 1. may not be for more than one 8year unless the joint review board approves, by resolution, the extension under 9subd. 1.SB689,3,1010